Georgia statutes. TITLE 45 Public Officers and Employees
Article 2 Comptroller General

Editor’s notes.

See the editor’s notes at the beginning of Article 1 of this chapter.

45-14-20 through 45-14-23.
[Repealed]

History.

Laws 1799, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 1022; Laws 1821, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, pp. 1023, 1024; Laws 1823, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 1025; Laws 1828, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 1027; Laws 1838, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 1029; Laws 1839, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, pp. 1031, 1032; Laws 1843, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 1033; Ga. L. 1851-52, p. 288, § 14; Ga. L. 1861, p. 80, § 9; Code 1863, §§ 96, 97, 100, 102; Code 1868, §§ 94, 95, 98, 100; Code 1873, §§ 101, 102, 105, 107; Code 1882, §§ 101, 102, 105, 107; Civil Code 1895, §§ 206, 209, 212, 214; Civil Code 1910, §§ 238, 241, 244, 246; Ga. L. 1923, Ex. Sess., p. 7, § 4; Ga. L. 1931, p. 7, § 91; Code 1933, §§ 40-1505, 40-1506, 40-1510; Ga. L. 1956, p. 802, § 2; Ga. L. 1978, p. 309, § 3; Code 1981, §

45-14-6

; Code 1981, §§

45-14-20

—45-14-23, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1986, p. 855, § 25; Ga. L. 1990, p. 8, § 45; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1402, § 18; Ga. L. 2010, p. 863, §§ 2, 3/SB 296; repealed by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1089, § 5/SB 343, effective July 1, 2012.